Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0848.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 223. (1) A person who knowingly sells a firearm without complying with section 2 of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.422, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $100.00, or both. (2) A person who knowingly sells a firearm more than 26 inches in length to a person under 18 years of age is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this subsection that the person who sold the firearm asked to see and was shown a driver license or identification card issued by a state that identified the purchaser as being 18 years of age or older. (3) A seller shall not sell a firearm or ammunition to a person if the seller knows that either of the following circumstances exists: (a) The person is under indictment for a felony. As used in this subdivision, "felony" means a violation of a law of this state, or of another state, or of the United States that is punishable by imprisonment for 4 years or more. (b) The person is prohibited under section 224f from possessing, using, transporting, selling, purchasing, carrying, shipping, receiving, or distributing a firearm. (4) A person who violates subsection (3) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years or by a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (5) A seller of a firearm shall not deliver the firearm to the purchaser of that firearm until at least 3 days after the date the sale of the firearm is completed. A person that violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both.